Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.100

Certified tribes—Procedure for tribal warrants. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1829-S.SL) ***

(1) Any arrest warrant issued by the court of a certified tribe shall be accorded full faith and credit by the courts of the state of Washington and enforced by the court and peace officers of the state as if it were the arrest warrant of the state. A Washington state peace officer who arrests a person pursuant to the arrest warrant of a certified tribe, if no other grounds for detention exist under state law, shall, as soon as practical after detaining the person, and in accordance with standard practices, contact the tribal law enforcement agency that issued the warrant to establish the warrant's validity.

(2) A place of detention shall allow a certified tribe to place a detainer on an inmate based on a tribal warrant. For the purposes of this section, detainer means a request by a certified tribe's tribal court, tribal police department, or tribal prosecutor's office, filed with the place of detention in which a person is incarcerated, to hold the person for the certified tribe and to notify the tribe when release of the person is imminent so that the person can be transferred to tribal custody.

(3) The privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall be available to any person detained under this provision.

[ 2024 c 207 s 11.]